District of Columbia statutes.
29-1010.01

Members’ contributions.

The organic rules shall establish the amount, manner, or method of determining any contribution requirements for members or shall authorize the board of directors to establish the amount, manner, or other method of determining any contribution requirements for members.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1001 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.